test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-esaek10_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - esäk: # Noun (10) esäk 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     esäk+N+Sg+Nom: esäk
     esäk+N+Sg+Gen: [esägä, esägü]
     esäk+N+Sg+Par: [esäkät, esäküt]
     esäk+N+Sg+Ill: [esäkähe, esäkühe, esäkäde, esäküde]
     esäk+N+Sg+Ine: [esäkän, esäkäh, esäkähn, esäkün, esäküh, esäkühn]
     esäk+N+Sg+Ela: [esäkäst, esäküst]
     esäk+N+Sg+All: [esäkäle, esäküle]
     esäk+N+Sg+Ade: [esäkäl, esäkül]
     esäk+N+Sg+Abl: [esäkält, esäkült]
     esäk+N+Sg+Tra: [esäkäs, esäküs]
     esäk+N+Sg+Ter: [esäkäniq, esäküniq]
     esäk+N+Sg+Abe: [esäkäldäq, esäküldäq]
     esäk+N+Sg+Com: [esäkägaq, esäkügaq, esägägaq, esägügaq]
     esäk+N+Pl+Nom: [esägäq, esägüq]
     esäk+N+Pl+Gen: [esäkide, esäkiide]
     esäk+N+Pl+Par: [esäkit, esäkiid]
     esäk+N+Pl+Ill: [esäkihe, esäkiihe, esäkide, esäkiide]
     esäk+N+Pl+Ine: [esäkin, esäkiin, esäkih, esäkiih, esäkihn, esäkiihn]
     esäk+N+Pl+Ela: [esäkist, esäkiist]
     esäk+N+Pl+All: [esäkile, esäkiile]
     esäk+N+Pl+Ade: [esäkil, esäkiil]
     esäk+N+Pl+Abl: [esäkilt, esäkiilt]
     esäk+N+Pl+Tra: [esäkis, esäkiis]
     esäk+N+Pl+Ter: [esäkiniq, esäkiiniq]
     esäk+N+Pl+Abe: [esäkildäq, esäkiildäq]
     esäk+N+Pl+Com: [esäkidegaq, esäkiidegaq]
